Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§200-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Beaches encumbered with easements in
favor of the public" means any lands which lie along the shores of the
State which are now, or may hereafter be, encumbered by easements granted in
favor of the public for bathing, swimming, or other similar or related purposes
and for foot passage.

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Chairperson" means the chairperson
of the board of land and natural resources.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Ocean waters" means all waters
seaward of the shoreline within the jurisdiction of the State.

"Sailing school vessel" means a
vessel:

(1) Less than five hundred gross tons, carrying six
or more individuals who are sailing school students or sailing school
instructors principally equipped for propulsion by sail even if the vessel has
an auxiliary means of propulsion;

(2) Owned or leased by a corporation, association,
organization, or other duly chartered entity determined under the Internal
Revenue Code to be exempt from the federal income tax and operated for the
purpose of providing sailing instruction and therapeutic, educational,
recreational, vocational, or family counseling services to emotionally
disturbed youth or to youth sentenced by the family court to a rehabilitative
sailing program and their families; and

(3) That is in compliance with title 46 Code of
Federal Regulations part 169.

"Shoreline" means the upper reaches
of the wash of the waves, usually evidenced by the edge of vegetation growth or
by the upper limit of debris left by the wash of the waves. [L 1991, c 272, pt
of §2; am L 1996, c 188, §3; am L 2012, c 27, §1]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next